Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Article 10 Applicability

15-8.1-1001.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-1002.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b).

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-1003.
Transitional provision.

This chapter applies to a pending proceeding to adjudicate parentage commenced before the effective date of this act [January 1, 2021] for an issue on which a judgment has not been entered.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-1004.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any individual or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.